Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-386.07
Unauthorized mutual associations; cease and desist order; appeal.

If the Director of Insurance orders any person to cease and desist all business of the association or any activity connected therewith, such order may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1969, c. 367, § 6, p. 1306;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 48.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.